Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 840-2.11a of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section,
nondisclosure agreements between a state employee and the state
agency or entity that employs such shall be deemed void and
unenforceable upon the:
1. Resignation of the employee from employment with such agency
or entity; or
2. Termination of employment of the employee by such agency or
entity.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not be
construed as applying to any state employee that has a mandated
professional privilege of confidentiality.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1415 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1415 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)